src/fst/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON BRINGE !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
              +V+Inf:bringe   #          ;
         +V+Inf+Pass:bringes  #          ;
              +V+Imp:bring    #          ;
          +V+Ind+Prs:bringer  #          ;
     +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:bringes  #          ;
          +V+Ind+Prt:brakte   #          ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+Err/Orth:bragte   #          ;
           +V+PrfPrc:brakt    #          ;
           +V+PrsPrc:bring    prsptcsuff ;
LEXICON BRISTE !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
          +V+Inf:briste  #          ;
     +V+Inf+Pass:bristes #          ;
          +V+Imp:brist   #          ;
      +V+Ind+Prs:brister #          ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:bristes #          ;
      +V+Ind+Prt:brast   #          ;
       +V+PrfPrc:brustet #          ;
       +V+PrsPrc:brist   prsptcsuff ;
LEXICON BRY !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
                 :bry    v4 ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Use/NG:brød   #  ;    
LEXICON XYTE !!≈ * **@CODE@** = yte, flyte, tryte
             +V+Inf:yte  #          ;
             +V+Inf+Pass:ytes  #          ;
             +V+Imp:yt   #          ;
         +V+Ind+Prs:yter #          ;
         +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:ytes #          ;
         +V+Ind+Prt:øt   #          ;
         +V+Ind+Prt+Use/NG:øyt  #          ;
          +V+PrfPrc:utt  #          ;
          +V+PrsPrc:yt   prsptcsuff ;
LEXICON BURDE !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
     +V+Inf:burde # ;
 +V+Ind+Prs:bør   # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt:burde # ;
LEXICON BY !!≈ * **@CODE@**
          +V+Inf:by   #          ;
          +V+Inf+Pass:by   #          ;
          +V+Imp:by   #          ;
      +V+Ind+Prs:byr  #          ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:bys  #          ;
      +V+Ind+Prt:bød  #          ;
       +V+PrfPrc:bydd #          ;
       +V+PrsPrc:by   prsptcsuff ;
LEXICON XYDE !!≈ * **@CODE@** = lyde, tyde, syde, ...
          +V+Inf:yde  #          ;
          +V+Inf+Pass:ydes  #          ;
          +V+Imp:yd   #          ;
      +V+Ind+Prs:yder #          ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:ydes #          ;
      +V+Ind+Prt:ød   #          ;
       +V+PrfPrc:ydd  #          ;
       +V+PrsPrc:yd   prsptcsuff ;
LEXICON BÆRE !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
          +V+Inf:bære  #          ;
          +V+Inf+Pass:bæres  #          ;
          +V+Imp:bær   #          ;
      +V+Ind+Prs:bærer #          ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:bæres #          ;
      +V+Ind+Prt:bar   #          ;
       +V+PrfPrc:båret #          ;
       +V+PrsPrc:bær   prsptcsuff ;
LEXICON XETTE !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
         +V+Inf:ette  #          ;
         +V+Inf+Pass:ettes  #          ;
         +V+Imp:ett   #          ;
     +V+Ind+Prs:etter #          ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:ettes #          ;
     +V+Ind+Prt:att   #          ;
      +V+PrfPrc:ettet #          ;
      +V+PrsPrc:ett   prsptcsuff ;
LEXICON DRA !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
     +V+Inf:dra   #          ;
     +V+Inf+Pass:dras   #          ;
     +V+Imp:dra   #          ;
 +V+Ind+Prs:drar  #          ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:dras  #          ;
 +V+Ind+Prt:dro   #          ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+Use/NG:drog  #          ;
  +V+PrfPrc:dratt #          ;
  +V+PrsPrc:dra   prsptcsuff ;
LEXICON XIKKE !!≈ * **@CODE@** = drikke
         +V+Inf:ikke  #          ;
   +V+Inf+Pass:ikkes  #          ;
         +V+Imp:ikk   #          ;
     +V+Ind+Prs:ikker #          ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:ikkes #          ;
     +V+Ind+Prt:akk   #          ;
      +V+PrfPrc:ukket #          ;
      +V+PrsPrc:ikk   prsptcsuff ;
LEXICON DRIVE !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
          +V+Inf:drive  #          ;
    +V+Inf+Pass:drives  #          ;
          +V+Imp:driv   #          ;
      +V+Ind+Prs:driver #          ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:drives #          ;
      +V+Ind+Prt:drev   #          ;
       +V+PrfPrc:drevet #          ;
       +V+PrsPrc:driv   prsptcsuff ;
LEXICON DRITE !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
          +V+Inf:drite  #          ;
    +V+Inf+Pass:drites  #          ;
          +V+Imp:driv   #          ;
      +V+Ind+Prs:driter #          ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:drites #          ;
      +V+Ind+Prt+Use/NG:dret   #          ;
      +V+Ind+Prt:dreit  #          ;
       +V+PrfPrc+Use/NG:dritt  #          ;
       +V+PrcPrc:dritet #          ;
       +V+PrsPrc:drit   prsptcsuff ;
LEXICON DØLGE !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
          +V+Inf:dølge  #          ;
     +V+Inf+Pass:dølges #          ;
          +V+Imp:dølg   #          ;
      +V+Ind+Prs:dølger #          ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:dølges #          ;
      +V+Ind+Prt:dulgte #          ;
       +V+PrfPrc:dulgt  #          ;
       +V+PrsPrc:dølg   prsptcsuff ;
LEXICON DØ !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
          +V+Inf:dø   #          ;
          +V+Imp:dø   #          ;
      +V+Ind+Prs:dør  #          ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:døes #          ;
      +V+Ind+Prt:døde #          ;
       +V+PrfPrc:dødd #          ;
        +V+Prdtc:dø   prsptcsuff ;
LEXICON EIE !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
         +V+Inf:eie  #          ;
   +V+Inf+Pass:eies  #          ;
         +V+Imp:ei   #          ;
     +V+Ind+Prs:eier #          ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:eies #          ;
     +V+Ind+Prt:eide #          ;
     +V+Ind+Prt+Use/NG:eiet #          ;
     +V+Ind+Prt+Use/NG:åtte #          ;
      +V+PrfPrc:eid  #          ;
      +V+PrfPrc+Use/NG:eiet #          ;
      +V+PrfPrc+Use/NG:ått  #          ;
      +V+PrsPrc:ei   prsptcsuff ;
LEXICON ETE !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
          +V+Inf:ete  #          ;
    +V+Inf+Pass:etes  #          ;
          +V+Imp:et   #          ;
      +V+Ind+Prs:eter #          ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:etes #          ;
      +V+Ind+Prt:åt   #          ;
       +V+PrfPrc:ett  #          ;
       +V+PrsPrc:et   prsptcsuff ;
LEXICON FALLE !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
          +V+Inf:falle  #          ;
          +V+Imp:fall   #          ;
      +V+Ind+Prs:faller #          ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:falles #          ;
      +V+Ind+Prt:falt   #          ;
       +V+PrfPrc:falt   #          ;
       +V+PrsPrc:fall   prsptcsuff ;
LEXICON FARE !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
          +V+Inf:fare  #          ;
          +V+Imp:far   #          ;
      +V+Ind+Prs:farer #          ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:fares #          ;
      +V+Ind+Prt:for   #          ;
       +V+PrfPrc:fart  #          ;
       +V+PrsPrc:far   prsptcsuff ;
LEXICON FINNE !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
          +V+Inf:finne  #          ;
          +V+Imp:finn   #          ;
      +V+Ind+Prs:finner #          ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:finnes #          ;
 +v+Ing+Prs+Pass:fins   #          ;
      +V+Ind+Prt:fant   #          ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+Pass:fantes #          ;
       +V+PrfPrc:funnet #          ;
  +V+PrfPrc+Pass:funnes #          ;
       +V+PrsPrc:finn   prsptcsuff ;
LEXICON FISE !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
          +V+Inf:fise  #          ;
          +V+Imp:fis   #          ;
      +V+Ind+Prs:fiser #          ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:fises #          ;
      +V+Ind+Prt+Use/NG:fes   #          ;
      +V+Ind+Prt:feis  #          ;
      +V+Ind+Prt+Use/NG:fiste #          ;
       +V+PrfPrc:fist  #          ;
       +V+PrfPrc+Use/NG:feset #          ;
       +V+PrsPrc:fis   prsptcsuff ;
LEXICON FLY !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
          +V+Inf:fly    #          ;
          +V+Imp:fly    #          ;
      +V+Ind+Prs:flyr   #          ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:flys   #          ;
      +V+Ind+Prt:fløy   #          ;
       +V+PrfPrc:flydd  #          ;
       +V+PrfPrc+Use/NG:fløyet #          ;
       +V+PrsPrc:fly    prsptcsuff ;
LEXICON FLYGE !!≈ * **@CODE@**
           +V+Inf:flyge  #          ;
           +V+Imp:flyg   #          ;
       +V+Ind+Prs:flyger #          ;
  +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:flyges #          ; 
       +V+Ind+Prt:fløy   #          ;
        +V+PrfPrc:fløyet #          ;
        +V+PrsPrc:flyg   prsptcsuff ;
+V+PrsPrc+Err/Orth:flyv  prsptcsuff ;

LEXICON FLYTE !!≈ * **@CODE@**
              +V+Inf:flyte    # ;
              +V+Imp:flyt     # ;
     +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:flytes   # ;
          +V+Ind+Prs:flyter   # ;
          +V+Ind+Prt:fløyt    # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+Err/Orth:flaut    # ;
   +V+Ind+Prt+Use/NG:fløt     # ;
           +V+PrfPrc:flytt    # ;
           +V+PrsPrc:flytende # ;
