src/fst/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON VerbRoot
anbringe:an BRINGE ; !!≈ * @CODE@ 
anfalle:an FALLE ; !!≈ * @CODE@ 
avbryte:avbr XYTE ;
avfinne:av FINNE ;
bedra:be DRA ;
bedrive:be DRIVE ;
befinne:be FINNE ;
bibringe:bi BRINGE ;
bidra:bi DRA ;
bifalle:bi FALLE ;
bortfalle:bort FALLE ;
bringe: BRINGE ;
briste: BRISTE ;
bry: BRY ;
bryte:br XYTE ;
burde: BURDE ;
byde:b XYDE ;
bære: BÆRE ;
bønnfalle:bønn FALLE ;
dette:d XETTE ; ! dette
dra: DRA ;
drikke:dr XIKKE ;
drite: DRITE ;
drive: DRIVE ;
dø: DØ ;
dølge: DØLGE ;
eie: EIE ;
ete:		 ETE ;
falle: FALLE ; !!≈ * @CODE@ 
henfalle: FALLE ;
fare: FARE ;
finne: FINNE ;
fise: FISE ;
fly: FLY ;
flyge: FLYGE ;
flyte: FLYTE ;
forbryte:forbr XYTE ;
forby:for BY ;
forbyde:forb XYDE ;
fordrive:for DRIVE ;
foredra:fore DRA ;
forefalle:fore FALLE ;
forfalle:for FALLE ;
forlyde:forl XYDE ;
frafalle:fra FALLE ;
frambringe:fram BRINGE ;
frembringe:frem BRINGE ;
frifinne:fri FINNE ;
gjendrive:gjen DRIVE ;
gjenfinne:gjen FINNE ;
gjenlyde:gjenl XYDE ;
innbringe:inn BRINGE ;
inndra:inn DRA ;
inndrive:inn DRIVE ;
innebære:inne BÆRE ;
innfinne:inn FINNE ;
misfare:mis FARE ;
oppdra:opp DRA ;
oppdrive:opp DRIVE ;
oppebære:oppe BÆRE ;
overbringe:over BRINGE ;
overdra:over DRA ;
overdrive:over DRIVE ;
overfalle:over FALLE ;
overfly:over FLY ;
pådra:på DRA ;
saumfare:saum FARE ;
selvdø:selv DØ ;
sjøldø:sjøl DØ ;
skamfare:skam FARE ;
tilbringe:til BRINGE ;
tilby:til BY ;
tilbyde:tilb XYDE ;
tilfalle:til FALLE ;
tilflyte:til FLYTE ;
tilveiebringe:tilveie BRINGE ;
unndra:unn DRA ;
utbringe:ut BRINGE ;
utbryte:utbr XYTE ;
